Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3711
Volunteer; prohibited acts.

A court appointed special advocate volunteer shall not:

(1) Accept any compensation for the duties and responsibilities of his or her appointment;

(2) Have any association that creates a conflict of interest with his or her duties;

(3) Be related to any party or attorney involved in a case;

(4) Be employed in a position that could result in a conflict of interest or give rise to the appearance of a conflict; or

(5) Use the position to seek or accept gifts or special privileges.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 34.